District of Columbia statutes.
16-519

Defenses by garnishee.

A garnishee in an attachment proceeding may make any defense available to the defendant in the action in which the garnishment is issued.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 549, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-519.
1973 Ed., § 16-519.